Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2343
Anti-lapse; deceased devisee; class gifts.

If a devisee related to the testator in any degree of kinship is dead at the time of execution of the will, fails to survive the testator, or is treated as if he predeceased the testator, the issue of the deceased devisee who survive the testator by one hundred twenty hours take in place of the deceased devisee and if they are all of the same degree of kinship to the devisee they take equally, but if of unequal degree then those of more remote degree take by representation. One who would have been a devisee under a class gift if he had survived the testator is treated as a devisee for purposes of this section whether his death occurred before or after the execution of the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 65, UPC § 2-605.

Nothing in this section or subsection (b) of section 30-2344 places any limitation upon the estate which passes to the issue of a deceased devisee by operation of this section. In re Estate of Eickmeyer, 262 Neb. 17, 628 N.W.2d 246 (2001).